Hawaii statutes.
§53-26 Powers of redevelopment
corporations. Each redevelopment corporation shall have and may exercise
such of the powers conferred by the general corporation laws as are necessary
in conducting the business of a redevelopment corporation and consistent with
this part. [L 1949, c 379, §9; RL 1955, §143-25; HRS §53-26]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next